Massachusetts, session 194th, H5315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws,
section 52 of chapter 206 of the acts of 2024 and any other general or special law to the contrary,
the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall provide the city of Waltham with
a right of first refusal over the lease of the Veterans Memorial rink in the city of Waltham
authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of said section 52 of said chapter 206 provided that the city
meets the prequalification standards set forth in subsection (b).
(b) Before the division sends out a request for proposals for lease of the Veterans
Memorial rink in the city of Waltham pursuant to subsection (c) of said section 52 of said
of 2

chapter 206, the division shall solicit a prequalification proposal from the city for said lease. The
division’s prequalification solicitation shall be sent in writing to the clerk and mayor of the city
of Waltham and shall seek information to address: (1) the ability of the city to finance any capital
improvements determined to be necessary at the rink by the division and to manage, operate and
maintain the property; and (2) the terms and conditions set forth in said subsection (c) of said
section 52 of said chapter 206. No later than 30 days after receipt of the prequalification
solicitation, the city may submit a prequalification proposal to the division. No later than 15 days
after receipt of the prequalification proposal from the city, the division shall determine whether
the city’s proposal satisfies the requirements of the solicitation. If the division determines that
the proposal satisfies the requirements of the solicitation, the city shall be considered
prequalified and the city shall be awarded the lease for the Veterans Memorial rink in the city of
Waltham under the terms and conditions set forth in said section 52 of said chapter 206 for
nominal consideration.
(c) If the city fails to apply for prequalification under subsection (b) or is determined not
to be prequalified under subsection (b), the division shall proceed with a request for proposal
pursuant to subsection (c) of said section 52 of said chapter 206; provided, however, that the city
may submit a bid in response to the request for proposal and the division shall consider the city’s
bid.
of 2